Utah statutes.
67-19-16.   Appointments to Schedule B positions -- Examinations -- Hiring
lists -- Probationary service -- Dismissal.
(1)  Each appointment to a position under Schedule B shall be made from hiring
lists of applicants who have been selected by competitive procedures as
defined by the executive director.
(2)  The executive director shall publicly announce information regarding
career service positions:
(a)  for periods of time to be determined by the executive director; and
(b)  in a manner designed to attract the highest number of qualified
applicants.
(3)  The executive director shall make rules establishing standards for the
development, approval, and implementation of examining processes, including
establishing a department approved on the job examination to appoint a
qualified person with a disability.
(4)  Applicants for employment to Schedule B positions shall be eligible for
appointment based upon rules established by the executive director.
(5) (a)  The agency head shall make appointments to fill vacancies from hiring
lists for probationary periods as defined by rule.
(b)  The executive director shall make rules establishing probationary
periods.
(6)  A person serving a probationary period may not use the grievance
procedures provided in this chapter and in Chapter 19a, Grievance Procedures,
and may be dismissed at any time by the appointing officer without hearing or
appeal.
(7)  Career service status shall be granted upon the successful completion of
the probationary period.
